Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.060

Injunctions.

The director may bring an action to enjoin any violation of this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter in the superior court of Thurston county or of any county in which a violation occurs, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

[ 1998 c 154 s 26.]